Illinois, session 104th, HB5011.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Municipal Code is amended by 5changing Section 11-1-12 as follows: 6    (65 ILCS 5/11-1-12)7    Sec. 11-1-12. Quotas prohibited. A municipality may not 8require a police officer to issue a specific number of 9citations within a designated period of time. This prohibition 10shall not affect the conditions of any federal or State grants 11or funds awarded to the municipality and used to fund traffic 12enforcement programs.13    A municipality may not, for purposes of evaluating a 14police officer's job performance, compare the number of 15citations issued by the police officer to the number of 16citations issued by any other police officer who has similar 17job duties. Nothing in this Section shall prohibit a 18municipality from evaluating a police officer based on the 19police officer's points of contact. For the purposes of this 20Section, "points of contact" means any quantifiable contact 21made in the furtherance of the police officer's duties, 22including, but not limited to, the number of traffic stops 23completed, arrests, written warnings, and crime prevention   HB5011 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 19523 RTM 32971 b1measures. Points of contact shall not include either the 2issuance of citations or the number of citations issued by a 3police officer.4    A home rule municipality may not establish requirements 5for or assess the performance of police officers in a manner 6inconsistent with this Section. This Section is a denial and 7limitation of home rule powers and functions under subsection 8(g) of Section 6 of Article VII of the Illinois Constitution. 9(Source: P.A. 100-1001, eff. 1-1-19.)